District of Columbia statutes.
9-313

Connecticut Avenue Bridge over Klingle Valley.

Any street railway company using the new Connecticut Avenue Bridge over Klingle Valley shall install thereon at its own expense an approved standard underground system and an overhead trolley system of street car propulsion, including trolley poles of approved design, and at its own expense shall thereafter maintain such underground and overhead construction and bear the cost of surfacing, resurfacing, and maintaining in good condition the space between the railway tracks and 2 feet exterior thereto, and shall defray the cost of excess construction occasioned by such use.

History

July 3, 1930, 46 Stat. 962, ch. 848

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-513.
1973 Ed., § 7-513.